District of Columbia statutes.
15-368

Stay of proceedings pending appeal of foreign-country judgment.

If a party establishes that an appeal from a foreign-country judgment is pending or will be taken, the court may stay any proceedings with regard to the foreign-country judgment until the:

(1)

Appeal is concluded;

(2)

Time for appeal expires; or

(3)

Appellant has had sufficient time to prosecute the appeal and has failed to do so.

Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-86, § 2(b), 58 DCR 11186
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 8 of the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act.